Indiana, session 2026, HB1138.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3-3-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 11. (a) Each taxable
year, an individual who is eligible to claim the federal child and
dependent care tax credit under Section 21 of the Internal Revenue
Code is entitled to a credit against the individual's, and the
individual's spouse's in the case of a joint return, adjusted gross
income tax liability equal to:
(1) the allowable amount of the federal child and dependent
care tax credit that the taxpayer claimed on the taxpayer's
federal income tax return for the taxable year under Section
21 of the Internal Revenue Code; multiplied by
(2) the following applicable percentage:
(A) If the adjusted gross income of the individual, and the
individual's spouse in the case of a joint return, is forty
thousand dollars ($40,000) or less, one hundred percent
(100%).
2026 IN 1138—LS 6189/DI 134


(B) If the adjusted gross income of the individual, and the
individual's spouse in the case of a joint return, is greater
than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) and not more than
sixty thousand dollars ($60,000), seventy-five percent
(75%).
(C) If the adjusted gross income of the individual, and the
individual's spouse in the case of a joint return, is greater
than sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) and not more than
seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), fifty percent
(50%).
If the adjusted gross income of the individual, and the individual's
spouse in the case of a joint return, is greater than seventy-five
thousand dollars ($75,000), the individual is not entitled to a credit
against the individual's adjusted gross income tax liability.
(b) If the credit provided by this section exceeds the amount of
the individual's adjusted gross income tax liability for the taxable
year, reduced by the sum of all credits for the taxable year that are
applied before the application of the credit provided by this
section, the excess shall be refunded to the individual.
SECTION 2. [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]
(a) IC 6-3-3-11, as added by this act, applies to taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2025.
(b) This SECTION expires June 30, 2029.
SECTION 3. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1138—LS 6189/DI 134